Texas, session 892, SB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 402, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter E to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER E. PROSECUTION OF CRIMINAL OFFENSES PRESCRIBED BY STATE ELECTION LAWS Sec. 402.151.  APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies to a criminal offense under the Election Code. Sec. 402.152.  PROVISION OF INFORMATION TO ATTORNEY GENERAL. (a) A law enforcement agency shall submit to the attorney general any report stating there is probable cause to believe an identified person has committed a criminal offense described by Section 402.151. (b)  A local prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agency shall provide any information requested by the attorney general regarding investigations of criminal offenses described by Section 402.151 to assist the attorney general in performing duties required under this subchapter. Sec. 402.153.  PROSECUTION. Notwithstanding any other law, the attorney general has jurisdiction to prosecute and shall represent the state in the prosecution of a criminal offense described by Section 402.151. SECTION 2.  Sections 273.021(a) and (b), Election Code, are amended to read as follows: (a)  The attorney general has jurisdiction to [may] prosecute and shall represent the state in the prosecution of a criminal offense prescribed by the election laws of this state as provided by Subchapter E, Chapter 402, Government Code. (b)  The attorney general may appear before a grand jury in connection with a criminal [an] offense the attorney general is authorized to prosecute under Subsection (a). SECTION 3.  Section 273.022, Election Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 273.022.  COOPERATION WITH LOCAL PROSECUTOR.  The attorney general may direct the county or district attorney serving the county in which the offense is to be prosecuted to prosecute a criminal [an] offense that the attorney general is authorized to prosecute under Section 273.021 or to assist the attorney general in the prosecution. SECTION 4.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to an offense committed on or after the effective date of this Act. An offense committed before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect on the date the offense was committed, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. For purposes of this section, an offense was committed before the effective date of this Act if any element of the offense occurred before that date. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I hereby certify that S.B. No. 12 passed the Senate on August 19, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 18, Nays 12. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate I hereby certify that S.B. No. 12 passed the House on August 26, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 85, Nays 54, one present not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House Approved: ______________________________ Date ______________________________ Governor